Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 5. Hog Cholera Virus.

§ 69-17-201.
Restriction on possession, sale or other disposition of virus; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation or association to have in possession or keep, sell or offer for sale, barter, exchange, give away or otherwise dispose of hog cholera virus, except at Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science and under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian and with a special written permit issued by the board of animal health. “Hog cholera virus” means an unattenuated virus administered to swine for the purpose of immunizing such swine from the disease known as hog cholera.

Any person, firm, corporation or association violating any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5440; 1942, § 4863; Laws, 1928, ch. 50; Laws, 1932, ch. 264; Laws, 1954, ch. 150, §§ 1, 2, eff July 1, 1954.